Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 3. The Virginia Higher Education Opportunity Act of 2011.
§ 23.1-308.
STEM public-private partnership established; duties.

To (i) increase the number of students completing degrees in the high-demand, high-impact STEM fields and other high-demand, anticipated-shortage fields such as the health care-related professions and (ii) help develop and guide the implementation of a comprehensive plan for higher degree attainment in these fields, the Secretaries of Education and Finance, in cooperation with the House Committees on Appropriations and Education and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health, shall form a public-private partnership comprised of private-sector leaders, distinguished representatives from the scientific community, including retired military personnel, government scientists, and researchers, educational experts, relevant state and local government officials, and such other individuals as they deem appropriate.

The partnership shall advise on, and may collaborate with public and private entities to develop and implement strategies to address, such priority issues as (i) determining the need for additional high-demand degree enrollment, capacity, and resources at public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education; (ii) incentivizing greater coordination, innovation, and private collaboration in kindergarten through secondary school STEM and other high-demand degree initiatives; (iii) determining and refining best practices in STEM instruction and leveraging those best practices to promote STEM education in both the Commonwealth’s institutions of higher education and its elementary and secondary schools; (iv) enhancing teacher education and professional development in STEM disciplines; (v) strengthening mathematics readiness in secondary schools through earlier diagnosis and remediation of deficiencies; (vi) providing financial incentives to increase STEM enrollment and degree production at the Commonwealth’s institutions of higher education; (vii) providing assistance to public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education in the acquisition and improvement of STEM-related facilities and equipment; (viii) providing STEM incentives in early pathway programs at institutions of higher education and in the Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program; (ix) assessing degree programs using such economic opportunity metrics as marketplace demand, earning potential, and employer satisfaction and other indicators of the historical and projected economic value and impact of degrees to provide useful information on degrees to students as they make career choices and to state policy makers and university decision makers as they decide how to allocate scarce resources; (x) aligning state higher education efforts with marketplace demands; and (xi) determining such other issues as the partnership deems relevant to increasing the number of students completing degrees in STEM and other high-demand fields at institutions of higher education.

History.

2011, cc. 828, 869, § 23-38.87:19; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program” for “comprehensive community college transfer grant program” in clause (viii) of subsection B.

§ 23.1-309.
Higher Education Advisory Committee established; duties.

The Secretary of Education, in consultation with the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Secretary of Finance, and each public institution of higher education, shall convene a Higher Education Advisory Committee (Advisory Committee) to provide advice and make recommendations on the matters set forth in subsections B, C, and D. The Advisory Committee shall consist of at least 11 members as follows: one representative of the Office of the Secretary of Education appointed by the Secretary of Education who shall serve as chair of the Advisory Committee; one representative of the Office of the Secretary of Finance appointed by the Secretary of Finance; one representative of the Council appointed by the Chairman of the Council; the staff directors of the House Appropriations Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, or their designees; and the presidents or their designees of five public institutions of higher education, which shall include two doctoral institutions, two comprehensive institutions, and one comprehensive community college, appointed by the presidents of the public institutions of higher education, and a representative from a nonprofit private institution of higher education appointed by the Governor who shall not provide advice or make recommendations concerning policies that solely impact public institutions of higher education. Both the Governor and the Advisory Committee may designate other individuals to serve on the Advisory Committee, including representatives of academic and instructional faculty or fiscal officers of public institutions of higher education.

Consistent with the objective and purposes of this chapter identified in §

23.1-301

, the Advisory Committee shall develop and subsequently review at least once every five years, in consultation with the staff of the Council and the respective Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Education and the Chairmen of the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health, or their designees, representatives of public institutions of higher education, and such other state officials as may be designated by the Governor, and with assistance from the staff of the Council and such other assistance as it may require:

The methodology established pursuant to subsection A of §

23.1-304

for determining how a significant increment of state funding shall follow the student to the associate-degree-granting or baccalaureate public institution of higher education in which the student enrolls, how the amount of such per student funding for baccalaureate public institutions of higher education will be made to correspond as nearly as practical to the per student allocation envisioned under the then-existing appropriation for the Tuition Assistance Grant Act (§

23.1-628

et seq.) for students attending nonprofit private institutions of higher education, how and as of what date the student enrollment at each public institution of higher education shall be calculated, and how an increase or decrease in Virginia undergraduate student enrollment above or below the enrollment level used to calculate the institution’s funding pursuant to §

23.1-303

shall be reflected in the institution’s appropriation pursuant to subsection A of §

23.1-304

, and the standards and process for determining whether an increase or decrease in Virginia undergraduate student enrollment qualifies for funding pursuant to § 23.1-304;

Criteria for determining which families qualify as “low-income” and “middle-income” for purposes of §

23.1-306

and how they relate to federal, state, and institutional policies governing the provision of financial assistance to students of such families;

Objective performance criteria for measuring the financial incentives set forth in §

23.1-305

and the benefits of meeting or consequences of not meeting the incentives included in an institution’s six-year plan pursuant to §

23.1-306

;

Economic opportunity metrics such as marketplace demand, earning potential, and employer satisfaction and other indicators of the historical and projected economic value of degrees that can be used to assess degree programs in order to provide useful information on the economic impact of degrees to students as they make career choices and state policy makers and university decision makers as they decide how to allocate scarce resources;

The additional authority that should be granted to all public institutions of higher education under the Restructured Higher Education Financial and Administrative Operations Act (§

23.1-1000

et seq.), state goals and objectives each public institution of higher education should be expected to achieve, objective criteria for measuring educational-related performance with regard to those goals and objectives, and the benefits of meeting or consequences of not meeting those goals and objectives, including those set forth in subsection C of §

23.1-1002

; and

The role of private institutions of higher education in addressing the goals set forth in this chapter and recommendations regarding such matters.The Advisory Committee shall submit its recommendations to the Council, which shall review the recommendations and report its recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Education and the Chairmen of the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health.

Consistent with the objective and purposes of this chapter identified in §

23.1-301

, the Advisory Committee shall review at least every five years, in consultation with the staff of the Council, the respective Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Education and the Chairmen of the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health, or their designees, representatives of public institutions of higher education, and such other state officials as may be designated by the Governor, and with assistance from the staff of the Council and such other assistance as it may require:

Federal and state financial aid programs and institutional practices to ensure that the appropriate level of financial assistance is being provided to both low-income and middle-income families, as required by §

23.1-306

, including loan forgiveness programs targeted by purpose in furtherance of the objective of this chapter; and

The Restructured Higher Education Financial and Administrative Operations Act (§

23.1-1000

et seq.) to identify additional ways to reduce costs and enhance efficiency by increasing managerial autonomy with accountability at the institutional level.The Advisory Committee shall submit its recommendations to the Council, which shall review the recommendations and report its recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Education and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Education and Health.

The Advisory Committee shall periodically assess, based upon the institutions’ six-year plans and other relevant factors, the degree to which the Commonwealth’s system of higher education is meeting the statewide objectives of economic impact, reform, affordability, and access reflected in this chapter and the strategic impact of new general fund investments on achieving those objectives. The Advisory Committee shall submit its assessment and recommendations to the Council, which shall review the assessment and recommendations and report its recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Education and the Chairmen of the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health.

In addition to providing advice and making recommendations on the matters set forth in subsections B, C, and D, the Advisory Committee shall perform such other duties and undertake such other responsibilities as requested by the Governor or the General Assembly.

History.

2011, cc. 828, 869, §§ 23-38.87:15, 23-38.87:20; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” and “the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “the House Appropriations Committee and the Senate Finance Committee” in subsection A and “Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Education and the Chairmen of the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health” for “Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Education and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Education and Health” in subsections B, C and D. March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-310.
Assessment and certification of institutions by the Council.

The Council shall annually assess the degree to which each institution has satisfied any goals or criteria developed by the Higher Education Advisory Committee pursuant to §

23.1-309

and no later than October 1 of each fiscal year provide a certified written report of the results of such annual assessment to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Education and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health. In order to assist the Council in its assessment, each public institution of higher education, and each nonprofit private institution of higher education eligible for and seeking to qualify for state general funds, shall furnish periodic reports, including copies of institutional financial aid audit reports and audited financial statements, and such other pertinent information, including student-level data, as may be required by the Council.

History.

2011, cc. 828, 869, § 23-38.87:21; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health” for “Senate Committees on Finance and on Education and Health.” March 10, 2021.